Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.535

State 911 coordination office and advisory committee—Uniform national standards.

The state 911 coordination office and the 911 advisory committee may participate in efforts to set uniform national standards for the 911 emergency communications system.

[ 2022 c 203 s 13; 1998 c 245 s 32; 1995 c 243 s 10.]

NOTES:

Modernization of statewide 911 emergency communications system—2022 c 203: See note following RCW 38.52.010.

Findings—Severability—1995 c 243: See notes following RCW 80.36.555.